Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6703XS (1) 91 sc/ns S.F. 2254 Section 1. Section 602.9110, Code 2026, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 602.9110 Other public employment prohibited. 3 An annuity shall not be paid to any person, except a 4 survivor, entitled to receive an annuity under this article 5 while the person is serving as a state officer or employee. 6 However, this section does not prohibit the payment of an 7 annuity to a senior judge while serving as provided in section 8 602.9206 or to a retired judge serving as a member of the 9 general assembly . 10 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect upon the 11 convening of the Ninety-second General Assembly in January 12 2027. 13